Utah statutes.
76-6-506.   Financial transaction card offenses -- Definitions.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Authorized credit card merchant" means a person as defined in Section
68-3-12 who is authorized by an issuer to furnish money, goods, services, or
anything else of value upon presentation of a financial transaction card by a
card holder and to present valid credit card sales drafts to the issuer for
payment.
(2)  "Automated banking device" means any machine which, when properly
activated by a financial transaction card or a personal identification code,
may be used for any of the purposes for which a financial transaction card may
be used.
(3)  "Card holder" means any person or organization named on the face of a
financial transaction card to whom or for whose benefit a financial
transaction card is issued.
(4)  "Credit card sales draft" means any sales slip, draft, or other written
or electronic record of a sale of money, goods, services, or anything else of
value made or purported to be made to or at the request of a card holder with
a financial transaction card, financial transaction card credit number, or
personal identification code, whether the record of the sale or purported sale
is evidenced by a sales draft, voucher, or other similar document in writing
or electronically recorded and transmitted.
(5)  "Financial transaction card" means:
(a)  any credit card, credit plate, bank services card, banking card, check
guarantee card, debit card, telephone credit card, or any other card, issued
by an issuer for the use of the card holder in obtaining money, goods,
services, or anything else of value on credit, or in certifying or
guaranteeing to a person or business the availability to the card holder of
the funds on deposit that are equal to or greater than the amount necessary to
honor a draft or check payable to the order of the person or business; or
(b)  any instrument or device used in providing the card holder access to a
demand or time deposit account for the purpose of making deposits of money or
checks in the account, or withdrawing funds from the account in the form of
money, money orders, travelers' checks or other form representing value, or
transferring funds from any demand or time deposit account to any credit card
account in full or partial satisfaction of any outstanding balance existing in
the credit card account.
(6)  "Issuer" means a business organization or financial institution or its
agent that issues a financial transaction card.
(7)  "Personal identification code" means any numerical or alphabetical code
assigned to a card holder by the issuer to permit the authorized electronic
use of the holder's financial transaction card.
